Arkansas, session 2025, SB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 7, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-7-147. Ivermectin without prescription or consultation with
healthcare professional.
(a) As used in this section, "over-the-counter medication" means
medication that may be legally sold and purchased without a prescription.
(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, ivermectin suitable for
human use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this
state without a prescription or consultation with a healthcare professional.

/s/A. Clark



*JMB277*
03-17-2025 12:14:12 JMB277